Utah statutes.
17-15-24 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Procurement -- Use of recycled goods.

The procurement officer or other person responsible for purchasing supplies for each county and each entity created by a county or joined by a county shall:

(1)  maintain for reference a copy of the current listing of recycled items available on a state contract as issued by the chief procurement officer appointed under Section 63G-6-204; and

(2)  give recycled items consideration when inviting bids and purchasing supplies, in compliance with Section 11-37-101.

